Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2608.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in Danville Borough, Montour County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the Borough of Danville certain land and buildings situate in Danville Borough, Montour County, for $1, on terms to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) is a portion of the former grounds of the Danville State Hospital consisting of three parcels of land collectively containing approximately 4.48 acres and improvements thereon, together with any right, title and interest of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in an unopened 12345678910111213141516171819 alley, bounded and more particularly described as follows:PARCEL 1ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at a Mag Nail set on the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street) with the intersection of the easterly right-of-way of a 16 foot wide Alley, said Mag Nail is located at the northwest corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence along the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006, (aka East Market Street) and along a curve to the left in a southeasterly direction having a delta angle of 8 degrees 37 minutes 27 seconds, a radius of 2,025.00 feet, with an arc length of 304.81 feet and further described with a chord bearing and distance of South 41 degrees 08 minutes 06 seconds East 304.52 feet to a point of tangency; thence continuing along the southerly right-of-way of said PA State Route 2006 South 45 degrees 26 minutes 44 seconds East 83.27 feet to a point at the northwest corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 17, Page 463; thence leaving said right-of-way and along the westerly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane and passing through an iron pin found on line at 1.26 feet distant South 32 degrees 27 minutes 17 seconds West 124.60 feet (total length of line) to an iron pin set at the northeasterly terminus of another 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the northerly line of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley, North 44 degrees 26 minutes 25 seconds West 409.00 feet to an iron pin set at the intersection of the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 20260HB2608PN3531 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 foot wide Alley with the northerly right-of-way of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the easterly right-of-way of the first mentioned 16 foot wide Alley, North 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds East 137.61 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.13 Acres of land in all.Being a portion of lands as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025, and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.PARCEL 2ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at a point on the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street), said point of beginning being at the northwest corner of lands of the Danville Municipal Authority as described in Deed Book 101, Page 909, said point being 4.92 feet distant on a bearing running North 43 degrees 34 minutes 09 seconds East from an iron pin found on line, said point of beginning being the northeast corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence along line of lands of the Danville Municipal Authority the following two bearings and distances: 1) South 43 degrees 34 minutes 09 seconds West 262.42 feet to an iron pin DGS Disk found; and 2) thence North 44 degrees 30 minutes 22 seconds West 210.71 feet to an iron pin DGS Disk found at a corner of lands of said Danville Municipal Authority and on the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in 20260HB2608PN3531 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Deed Book 68, Page 356; thence along the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane, North 36 degrees 45 minutes 19 seconds East 122.17 feet to an iron pin set at the southeasterly corner of a 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the easterly terminus of said Alley, North 33 degrees 54 minutes 45 seconds East 16.34 feet to an iron pin set at the northeasterly corner of the 16 foot wide Alley and at the southeast corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591, thence along the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591 and passing through an iron pin found at 123.33 feet distant, North 32 degrees 27 minutes 17 seconds East 124.60 feet (total length of line) to a point on the southerly right-of-way of the aforementioned PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street); thence along the southerly right-of-way of said PA State Route 2006 South 45 degrees 26 minutes 44 seconds East 251.88 feet to the point of BEGINNING.Being a portion of lands as described in Deed Book 17, Page 463 and also a portion of lands as described in Deed Book, 5 Page 426. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025 and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.PARCEL 3ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at an iron pin set on the easterly right of way of a 16 foot wide Alley that runs in a northeasterly and 20260HB2608PN3531 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 southwesterly directions, said pin is located at the intersection with the southwesterly corner of a second 16 foot wide Alley that runs southeasterly and northwesterly directions, said pin is located 153.63 feet distant on a bearing running South 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds West from a Mag Nail set at the intersection of the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street) with the easterly right-of-way of the first aforementioned 16 foot wide Alley which reference is also the northwest corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591, said pin also being the northwest corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence from the place of beginning and along the southerly right-of-way line of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley South 44 degrees 26 minutes 25 seconds East 411.54 feet to an iron pin set at the southeast terminus of said Alley and on the westerly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 17, Page 463; thence along the westerly line of other lands of said Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane and along the westerly line of lands of the Danville Municipal Authority as described in deed book 101, page 909 and passing through an iron pin DGS disk found on line at 122.17 feet distant South 36 degrees 45 minutes 19 seconds West 225.00 feet to an iron pin DGS disk found at a corner of lands of said Authority and corner of lands of Roger P. Gratton; thence along the northerly line of lands of said Gratton and along the northerly line of lands of, Joseph L. Estep, et.al, Linda L. Hampton, et.al., Frances Zimmerman, Joseph and Stella Hafer, Penn-East Enterprises, Inc., and Michael G. Collins, et.al, North 39 degrees 39 minutes 36 seconds West 438.69 feet (total 20260HB2608PN3531 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 length of line) to an iron pin set on the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 foot wide Alley and said set pin is also 14.45 feet distant west of an iron pin found on line at the northwesterly corner of lands of the aforementioned Michael Collins; thence along the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 foot wide Alley North 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds East 186.00 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.98 Acres of land in all.Being the same parcel as described in Deed Book 68, Page 356. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025, and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.TOGETHER WITH any right, title or interest of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in that certain 16' wide unopened alley lying between Lot 1 and Lot 3 as shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025 and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.The three parcels of land described above and the 16' wide unopened alley together constitute Tax Parcel Numbers 12-89-145 and 12-89-146.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under this 20260HB2608PN3531 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Restrictive covenants.--The deed shall contain a clause that the lands conveyed shall be used for municipal purposes, including, without limitation, fire department training, municipal buildings and municipal playgrounds and parks, and if at any time the Borough of Danville or its successor in function conveys the property or permits the property to be used for any purpose other than municipal purposes, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.20260HB2608PN3531 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by a quit claim deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(i) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(j) Alternative disposition.--In the event that this conveyance is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, as amended, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(k) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2608PN3531 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516